Hawaii statutes.
§554B-13 Declination, resignation,
incapacity, death, or removal of custodial trustee; designation of successor
custodial trustee. (a) A person designated as custodial trustee, before
accepting the custodial trust property, may decline to serve by notifying the
person who made the designation, the transferor, or the transferor's legal
representative. If the event giving rise to a transfer has not occurred, the
substitute custodial trustee designated under section 554B-3 becomes the
custodial trustee, and, if a substitute custodial trustee has not been
designated, the person who made the designation may designate a substitute
custodial trustee under section 554B-3. In other cases, the transferor or the
transferor's legal representative may designate a substitute custodial trustee.

(b) A custodial trustee who has accepted the
custodial trust property may resign by:

(1) Delivering written notice to the beneficiary and,
if the beneficiary is incapacitated, to the beneficiary's conservator, if any,
and to the successor custodial trustee, if any; and

(2) Transferring, recording, or registering the
custodial trust property in the name of and delivering the records to the
successor custodial trustee identified under subsection (c).

(c) If a custodial trustee or successor
custodial trustee is ineligible, resigns, dies, or becomes incapacitated, the
successor designated under section 554B-2 or 554B-3 becomes custodial trustee.
If there is no effective provision for a successor, the beneficiary, if not
incapacitated, may designate a successor custodial trustee. If the beneficiary
is incapacitated, or fails to act within ninety days after the ineligibility,
resignation, death, or incapacity of the custodial trustee, the beneficiary's
conservator becomes successor custodial trustee; and, if the beneficiary does
not have a conservator or the conservator declines to act, the resigning
custodial trustee may designate a successor custodial trustee.

(d) If a successor custodial trustee is not
designated by the foregoing procedure, the transferor, the legal representative
of the transferor or of the custodial trustee, an adult member of the
beneficiary's family, the guardian of the beneficiary, a person interested in
the custodial trust property or as appropriate, another person interested in
the welfare of the beneficiary may petition the court to designate a successor
custodial trustee.

(e) A custodial trustee who declines to serve
or resigns, or the legal representative of a deceased or incapacitated
custodial trustee, as soon as practicable, shall put the custodial trust
property and records in the possession and control of the successor custodial
trustee. A successor custodial trustee may enforce the obligation to deliver
custodial trust property and records, and becomes responsible for each item as
received.

(f) A beneficiary, the beneficiary's
conservator, an adult member of the beneficiary's family, the beneficiary's
guardian, a person interested in the custodial trust property or as
appropriate, or another person interested in the welfare of the beneficiary,
may petition the court to remove the custodial trustee for cause and designate
a successor custodial trustee, to require the custodial trustee to give bond,
or for other appropriate relief. [L 1989, c 76, pt of §1; am L 2004, c 161,
§23]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next